Hawaii statutes.
§286-26 Certificates of inspection.
(a) The following vehicles shall be certified as provided in subsection (e)
once every year:

(1) Trucks, truck-tractors, semitrailers, and pole
trailers having a gross vehicle weight rating of more than 10,000 pounds;

(2) Buses;

(3) Rental or U-drive motor vehicles two years of age
or older; and

(4) Taxicabs.

Ambulances shall be certified as provided in
subsection (e) once every six months.

(b) All other vehicles, including motorcycles,
trailers, semitrailers, and pole trailers having a gross vehicle weight rating
of 10,000 pounds or less, and antique motor vehicles as defined in section
249-1, except those in subsections (c) and (d), shall be certified as provided
in subsection (e) every twelve months; provided that any vehicle to which this
subsection applies shall not require inspection within two years of the date on
which the vehicle was first sold.

(c) Any vehicle that has been involved in an
accident shall be certified as provided in subsection (e) before it is operated
again if:

(1) It is determined by a police officer or an
insurer that the vehicle's equipment has been damaged so as to render the
vehicle unsafe; or

(2) It is rebuilt or restored.

(d) Every vehicle shall be certified prior to
the issuance of a temporary or permanent registration by the director of
finance and prior to the transfer of any registration; provided that this
requirement shall not apply to a subsequent transfer of registration in a
vehicle that carries a current certificate of inspection.

(e) Upon application for a certificate of
inspection to be issued for a vehicle, an inspection as prescribed by the
director under subsection (g) shall be conducted on the vehicle, and if the
vehicle is found to be in a safe operating condition, a certificate of
inspection shall be issued upon payment of a fee to be determined by the
director. The certificate shall state the effective date, the termination
date, the name of the issuing insurance carrier, and the policy number of the
motor vehicle insurance identification card for the inspected motor vehicle as
specified by section 431:10C-107 or state the information contained in the
proof of insurance card as specified by section 431:10G-106. A sticker,
authorized by the director, shall be affixed to the vehicle at the time a
certificate of inspection is issued. An inspection sticker which has been
lost, stolen, or destroyed shall be replaced without reinspection by the
inspection station that issued the original inspection sticker upon presentation
of the vehicle's current certificate of inspection; provided that the current
certificate of inspection and inspection sticker shall not have expired at the
time the replacement is requested. The director shall adopt rules to determine
the fee for replacement of lost, stolen, or destroyed inspection stickers.

(f) The operator of an official inspection
station shall pay, from the fee in subsection (e), an amount to be determined
by rules adopted pursuant to chapter 91 to the director of transportation.
This amount shall be expended only for administration and enforcement of the
periodic motor vehicle inspection program. The funds collected pursuant to
this subsection shall be deposited into the highway special fund.

(g) The director of transportation shall adopt
necessary rules for the administration of inspections and the issuance of
certificates of inspection.

(h) This section shall not apply to:

(1) Any motor vehicle which is covered by part XI,
governing safety of motor carrier vehicle operation and equipment; provided
that the rules adopted pursuant to part IA impose standards of inspection at
least as strict as those imposed under subsection (g) and that certification is
required at least as often as provided in subsections (a), (b), (c), and (d);
and

(2) Aircraft servicing vehicles that are being used
exclusively on lands set aside to the department of transportation for airport
purposes.

(i) As part of the inspection required by this
section, the owner of the vehicle to be inspected shall produce and display the
motor vehicle insurance identification card for the inspected motor vehicle
required by section 431:10C-107 or the proof of insurance card required by
section 431:10G-106. If no card is displayed, then the sticker authorized
by the director shall not be affixed to the vehicle and the certificate of
inspection shall not be issued. [L 1967, c 214, pt of §2; HRS §286-26; am L
1969, c 128, §1(3); am L 1970, c 73, §1(c); am L 1974, c 98, §2; am L Sp 1977
1st, c 20, §11; am L 1978, c 91, §9; am L 1982, c 13, §§1, 2; am L 1984, c 276,
§4; am L 1986, c 33, §1 and c 239, §1; am L 1987, c 222, §1; am L 1988, c 253,
§1; am L 1989, c 326, §1; am L 1990, c 34, §14; am L 1992, c 170, §1 and c 242,
§1; am L 1997, c 251, §§5, 6; am L 2002, c 138, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next